Wyoming, session 2026, HB0067.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
HB0067

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0335

Section 1. W.S. 39-13-105(a)(intro) and by creating
new paragraphs (viii) through (xi) and (f) is amended to
read:

39-13-105. Exemptions.

(a) The following persons who are bona fide Wyoming
residents for at least three (3) years not less than one
(1) year at the time of claiming the exemption are entitled
to receive the tax exemption provided by W.S.
39-11-105(a)(xxiv):

(viii) An honorably discharged veteran who
served on active duty in the armed forces of the United
States for not less than eighteen (18) consecutive months;

(ix) An honorably discharged veteran who served
in the Wyoming national guard for not less than eighteen
(18) consecutive months;

HB0067

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0335
(x) An active or reserve member of the Wyoming
national guard who is in good standing with the Wyoming
national guard;

(xi) An active or reserve member of the armed
forces who is in good standing with the armed forces.

(f) As used in this section:

(i) "Good standing" means an active or reserve
member of the armed services or the Wyoming national guard
who has completed a creditable year of service toward
military retirement in the calendar year immediately
preceding the application for the tax exemption under this
section;

(ii) "Honorably discharged veteran" means a
member of the armed forces of the United States whose
written evidence of separation from the armed forces shows
an honorable discharge or the rendition of honorable
military service.

HB0067

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0335
Section 2. The exemption provided by this act shall
first apply to the tax year beginning January 1, 2026.

Section 3. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0067